South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3181.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 15, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-15-450. (A) The State Law Enforcement Division (SLED) must develop and manage a statewide sexual extortion investigation and outcome database to facilitate the exchange of information between federal, state, county, and municipal law enforcement agencies. (B) All State, county, and municipal law enforcement agencies must furnish information they acquire relating to sexual extortion to SLED to be included in the database. (C) SLED may determine if information relating to sexual extortion received from federal law enforcement agencies and law enforcement agencies of other states is to be included in the database. (D) SLED is authorized pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act in Chapter 23, Title 1: (1) to promulgate emergency regulations to make the criteria effective for collection of database information until such time as permanent regulations are promulgated and affirmatively approved by the General Assembly; (2) to promulgate permanent regulations consistent with the criteria required on the effective date of this act, which are to be affirmatively approved by the General Assembly, and to amend those regulations to reflect changes made in the criteria; and (3) to promulgate permanent regulations concerning the punishment associated with intentional misuse of the database. (E) The information contained in this database is not subject to the provisions of the Freedom of Information Act. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----